Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Report by Holder

393A.220.
Report required by holder.

A holder of property presumed abandoned and subject to the custody of the administrator shall report in a record to the administrator concerning the property. A holder shall not be required to file a report if the holder has no property that is presumed abandoned. The administrator shall not require a holder to file a paper report.

A holder may contract with a third party to make the report required under subsection (1) of this section.

Whether or not a holder contracts with a third party under subsection (2) of this section, the holder shall be responsible:

To the administrator for the complete, accurate, and timely reporting of property presumed abandoned; and

For paying or delivering to the administrator property described in the report.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 22, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.230.
Content of report.

The report required under KRS

393A.220

shall:

Be signed by or on behalf of the holder and verified as to its completeness and accuracy;

If filed electronically, be in a secure format approved by the administrator which protects confidential information of the apparent owner in the same manner as required of the administrator and the administrator’s agent under KRS

393A.770

to

393A.830

;

Describe the property;

Except for a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument, contain the name, if known, last-known address, if known, and Social Security number or taxpayer identification number, if known or readily ascertainable, of the apparent owner of property with a value of fifty dollars ($50) or more;

For an amount held or owing under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract, contain the name and last-known address of the insured, annuitant, or other apparent owner of the policy or contract and of the beneficiary;

For property held in or removed from a safe-deposit box, indicate the location of the property, where it may be inspected by the administrator, and any amounts owed to the holder under KRS

393A.360

;

Contain the commencement date for determining abandonment under KRS

393A.040

to

393A.140

;

State that the holder has complied with the notice requirements of KRS

393A.270

;

Identify property that is a non-freely transferable security and explain why it is a non-freely transferable security; and

Contain other information the administrator prescribes.

A report under KRS

393A.220

may include in the aggregate items valued under fifty dollars ($50) each. If the report includes items in the aggregate valued under fifty dollars ($50) each, the administrator shall not require the holder to provide the name and address of an apparent owner of an item unless the information is necessary to verify or process a claim in progress by the apparent owner.

A report under KRS

393A.220

may include personal information as described in KRS 393A.780(1) about the apparent owner or the apparent owner’s property to the extent not otherwise prohibited by federal law.

If a holder has changed its name while holding property presumed abandoned or is a successor to another person that previously held the property for the apparent owner, the holder shall include in the report under KRS

393A.220

its former name or the name of the previous holder, if any, and the known name and address of each previous holder of the property.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 23, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.240.
When report to be filed.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, and subject to subsection (3) of this section, the report under KRS

393A.220

shall be filed before November 1 of each year and cover the twelve (12) months preceding July 1 of that year.

Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the report under KRS

393A.220

to be filed by an insurance company shall be filed before May 1 of each year for the immediately preceding calendar year.

Before the date for filing the report under KRS

393A.220

, the holder of property presumed abandoned may request the administrator extend the time for filing. The administrator may grant an extension. If the extension is granted, the holder may pay or make a partial payment of the amount the holder estimates ultimately will be due. The payment or partial payment terminates accrual of interest on the amount paid.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 24, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.250.
Retention of records by holder.

A holder required to file a report KRS

393A.220

shall retain records for ten (10) years after the later of the date the report was filed or the last date a timely report was due to be filed, unless a shorter period shall be provided by rule of the administrator. The holder may satisfy the requirement to retain records under this section through an agent. The records shall contain:

The information required to be included in the report;

The date, place, and nature of the circumstances that gave rise to the property right;

The amount or value of the property;

The last address of the apparent owner, if known to the holder; and

If the holder sells, issues, or provides to others for sale or issue in this state traveler’s checks, money orders, or similar instruments, other than third-party bank checks, on which the holder is directly liable, a record of the instruments while they remain outstanding indicating the state and date of issue.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 25, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.260.
Property reportable and payable or deliverable absent owner demand.

Property shall be reportable and payable or deliverable under this chapter even if the owner fails to make demand or present an instrument or document otherwise required to obtain payment.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 26, effective July 14, 2018.